Illinois, session 104th, SB828.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Child Death Review Team Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 515/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Child 8Death Review Team Act.9(Source: P.A. 88-614, eff. 9-7-94.)